Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB294.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 224A.300 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly finds that it is necessary to encourage regionalization,
consolidation, and partnerships among governmental agencies, and private parties
when appropriate, with the goal of making public water and wastewater treatment
secure for all Kentuckians. This is accomplished through the maximization of
financial, managerial, and technical resources and the protection of source water of
the Commonwealth. Based on these findings, the General Assembly declares that
the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority shall implement a program for reliable
infrastructure and the security and safety of water and wastewater systems as
authorized in the budget and directed by the General Assembly. The Energy and
Environment Cabinet shall provide technical support to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority as needed to implement this program.
(2) The authority shall be responsible for the management and operation of the Water
Resource Information System. The authority shall maintain and, at least annually,
update the information contained in this system to ensure its accuracy.
(3) The authority may request all branches of state and local government, including
special districts and water districts, to provide information relating to the status of
existing plants, the financial condition of existing systems, and the existing
regulatory authority held by agencies of government regarding the issue of water
management. All branches of state and local government shall, to the extent
reasonable and appropriate, comply with the authority's[such] requests for
information.
(4) The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A that require a water supply and distribution system receiving or
seeking funding to provide current information regarding the financial, managerial,
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2322
and technical aspects of its system and, thereafter, to furnish updates to the
information so provided.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:46 PM Jacketed